Wisconsin, session 2025, AB313.
do enact as follows:AB313,13Section 1. 224.72 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB313,2,54224.72 (4) (b) Submit evidence that establishes, to the division’s satisfaction, 5a minimum net worth of $250,000 for a mortgage banker or $100,000 for a mortgage 1broker. Evidence of net worth shall include the submission of recent financial 2statements accompanied by a written statement by an independent certified public 3accountant attesting that he or she has reviewed the financial statements in 4accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. This paragraph does not 5apply to a mortgage broker.AB313,2,66